Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.150

Student transportation allocation—Operating costs, determination and funding.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5009-S.SL) ***

Funds allocated for transportation costs, except for funds provided for transportation and transportation services to and from school shall be in addition to the basic education allocation. The distribution formula developed in RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be for allocation purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating specific levels of pupil transportation services by local districts. Operating costs as determined under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be funded at one hundred percent or as close thereto as reasonably possible for transportation of an eligible student to and from school as defined in RCW 28A.160.160(3). In addition, funding shall be provided for transportation services for students living within the walk area as determined under RCW 28A.160.160(5).

[ 2009 c 548 s 304; 1996 c 279 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 141; 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 2; 1981 c 265 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.41.505.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 304-311: "Sections 304 through 311 of this act take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2010 c 236 s 16; 2009 c 548 s 805.]

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Application—1996 c 279: "This act shall be effective for school transportation programs in the 1996-97 school year and thereafter." [ 1996 c 279 s 4.]

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 61: See note following RCW 28A.160.010.

Effective date—1981 c 265: "With the exception of sections 8 and 13 of this amendatory act, the effective date of this amendatory act is September 1, 1982. The superintendent of public instruction and the office thereof prior to the effective date of this amendatory act may take such actions as necessary for the orderly implementation thereof and during such period may carry out such data collection activities and district notification provisions as provided for herein." [ 1981 c 265 s 16.]

Severability—1981 c 265: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 265 s 17.]